Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 45. Enterprise Zone Development

154.45-001.
Purpose of Enterprise Zone Program. [Repealed.]

154.45-010.
Definitions for subchapter 45 of KRS Chapter 154. [Repealed.]

154.45-020.
Application for designation as enterprise zone — Interlocal governmental agreement — Application to amend boundaries of existing zone — Joint applications. [Repealed.]

154.45-030.
Boundary changes effective upon written approval of authority — Contents of application — Requirements for authority’s approval. [Repealed.]

154.45-040.
Areas eligible for designation as enterprise zone. [Repealed.]

154.45-050.
Number of enterprise zones limited — Preferred areas — Effect of revocation — Retention of certification and eligibility for tax exemption after removal of designation. [Repealed.]

154.45-060.
Enterprise Zone Authority of Kentucky — Membership — Terms — Meetings — Compensation — Staff. [Repealed.]

154.45-070.
Duties of authority. [Repealed.]

154.45-080.
Master business license. [Repealed.]

154.45-090.
Tax advantages, credits, and exemptions for qualified businesses. [Repealed.]

154.45-100.
Neighborhood enterprise association corporations — Establishment — Certification — Land owned by state and local governments to be leased to corporation — Tax exemption. [Repealed.]

154.45-110.
Duties of Department of Revenue — Report to General Assembly on fiscal impact of Enterprise Zone Program. [Repealed.]

154.45-120.
Education Cabinet to verify employment information of qualified businesses. [Repealed.]